dictsource/rup_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Aromanian
// Author: Andy Vladescu <andyvladescu770@gmail.com>, 29-05-2025

// Vowels
.L01 e i  // front vowels

.group a
        a      a
	ai     aI
        ai (_ 'aI     // word final diphthong syllable gets stressed
	au     aU
        au (_ 'aU     // word final diphthong syllable gets stressed

.group ã
        ã      @

.group â
        â      y

.group b
        b      b

.group c
        c      k
        c  (L01 tS
	ch (L01 c

.group d
        d      d
	dh     D
	dz     dz

.group e
        e      e
	ea     ea
	ea (_ 'e|a    // word penultimate syllable gets stressed (e.g. nãmuzea)
	ei     eI
        ei (_ 'eI     // word final diphthong syllable gets stressed
        eu     eU
        eu (_ 'eU     // word final diphthong syllable gets stressed

.group f
        f      f
	ff     f

.group g
        g      g
        g  (L01 dZ
	gh (L01 J

.group h
        h      h

.group i
        i      i
	i (A   j
     @) i (e_  j
        ii     iI

.group j
        j      Z

.group k
        k      k

.group l
        l      l
     _) lj (_  l^@
	lj     l^
	ll     l

.group m
        m      m
	mm     m

.group n
        n      n
	nj      n^
	nn     n

.group o
        o      'o
	oa     Oa
        oa (_  'o|a   // word penultimate syllable gets stressed (e.g. serenoa)   
	oi     oI
        oi (_ 'oI     // word final diphthong syllable gets stressed
        ou     oU
        ou (_ 'oU     // word final diphthong syllable gets stressed 

.group p
        p      p
	pp     p

.group q
        q      k

.group r
        r      R
	rr     R
     A) r (A   *
     C) r (A   @-*

.group s
     _) s (_       s@
     _) s (-       s
        s          s
     _) sh (_      S@
     _) sh (-      S
        sh         S

.group t
        t       t
	th      T
	ts      ts
	tt      t

.group u
        u       u
	u (A    w
	ului (_ =uluI     // word penultimate syllable gets stressed

.group v
        v       v

.group w
        w       w

.group x
        x       ks

.group y
        y       Q
	y (L01  j

.group z
        z       z
        zz      z
